California statutes. Probate Code
(g) The court investigator shall annually investigate and report to the court pursuant to Sections 1850 and 1851 if the conservator is authorized to act under this section. In addition to the other matters provided in Section 1851, the conservatee shall be specifically advised by the investigator that the conservatee has the right to object to the conservator’s powers granted under this section, and the report shall also include whether powers granted under this section are warranted. If the conservatee objects to the conservator’s powers granted under this section, or the investigator determines that some change in the powers granted under this section is warranted, the court shall provide a copy of the report to the attorney of record for the conservatee. If an attorney has not been appointed for the conservatee, one shall be appointed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1470) of
 Part 1. The attorney shall, within 30 days after receiving this report, do either of the following:

(1) File a petition with the court regarding the status of the conservatee.

(2) File a written report with the court stating that the attorney has met with the conservatee and determined that the petition would be inappropriate.

(h) A petition to terminate authority granted under this section shall be governed by Section 2359.

(i) This section does not affect a conservatorship of the estate of a person who has a major neurocognitive disorder.

(j) This section does not affect the laws that would
 otherwise apply in emergency situations.

(k) This section does not affect current law regarding the power of a probate court to fix the residence of a conservatee or to authorize medical treatment for a conservatee who has not been determined to have a major neurocognitive disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 41.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2357.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Guardian or conservator” includes a temporary guardian of the person or a temporary conservator of the person.

(2) “Ward or conservatee” includes a person for whom a temporary guardian of the person or temporary conservator of the person has been appointed.

(b) If the ward or conservatee requires medical treatment for an existing or continuing medical condition which is not authorized to be performed upon the ward or conservatee under Section 2252, 2353, 2354, or 2355, and the ward or conservatee is
 unable to give an informed consent to this medical treatment, the guardian or conservator may petition the court under this section for an order authorizing the medical treatment and authorizing the guardian or conservator to consent on behalf of the ward or conservatee to the medical treatment.

(c) The petition shall state, or set forth by medical affidavit attached thereto, all of the following so far as is known to the petitioner at the time the petition is filed:

(1) The nature of the medical condition of the ward or conservatee which requires treatment.

(2) The recommended course of medical treatment which is considered to be medically appropriate.

(3) The threat to the health of the ward or conservatee if authorization to consent to the recommended course of treatment is delayed or denied by the court.

(4) The predictable or probable outcome of the recommended course of treatment.

(5) The medically available alternatives, if any, to the course of treatment recommended.

(6) The efforts made to obtain an informed consent from the ward or conservatee.

(7) The name and addresses, so far as they are known to the petitioner, of the persons specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1510 in a guardianship proceeding or subdivision (b) of Section 1821 in a conservatorship proceeding.

(d) Upon the filing of the petition, unless an attorney is already appointed the court shall appoint the public defender or private counsel under Section 1471, to consult with and represent the ward or conservatee at the hearing on the petition and, if that appointment is made, Section 1472 applies.

(e) Notice of the petition shall be given as follows:

(1) Not less than 15 days before the hearing, notice of the time and place of the hearing, and a copy of the petition shall be personally served on the ward, if 12 years of age or older, or the conservatee, and on the attorney for the ward or conservatee.

(2) Not less than 15 days before the hearing, notice of the time and
 place of the hearing, and a copy of the petition shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the following persons:

(A) The spouse or domestic partner, if any, of the proposed conservatee at the address stated in the petition.

(B) The relatives named in the petition at their addresses stated in the petition.

(f) For good cause, the court may shorten or waive notice of the hearing as provided by this section. In determining the period of notice to be required, the court shall take into account both of the following:

(1) The existing medical facts and circumstances set forth in the petition or in a medical affidavit attached to the petition or in a medical
 affidavit presented to the court.

(2) The desirability, where the condition of the ward or conservatee permits, of giving adequate notice to all interested persons.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (e) and (f), the matter may be submitted for the determination of the court upon proper and sufficient medical affidavits or declarations if the attorney for the petitioner and the attorney for the ward or conservatee so stipulate and further stipulate that there remains no issue of fact to be determined.

(h) The court may make an order authorizing the recommended course of medical treatment of the ward or conservatee and authorizing the guardian or conservator to consent on behalf of the ward or conservatee to the
 recommended course of medical treatment for the ward or conservatee if the court determines from the evidence all of the following:

(1) The existing or continuing medical condition of the ward or conservatee requires the recommended course of medical treatment.

(2) If untreated, there is a probability that the condition will become life-endangering or result in a serious threat to the physical or mental health of the ward or conservatee.

(3) The ward or conservatee is unable to give an informed consent to the recommended course of treatment.

(i) Upon petition of the ward or conservatee or other interested person, the court may order that the guardian or conservator
 obtain or consent to, or obtain and consent to, specified medical treatment to be performed upon the ward or conservatee. Notice of the hearing on the petition under this subdivision shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 44.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2358.

When a guardian or conservator is appointed, the court may, with the consent of the guardian or conservator, insert in the order of appointment conditions not otherwise obligatory providing for the care, treatment, education, and welfare of the ward or conservatee. Any such conditions shall be included in the letters. The performance of such conditions is a part of the duties of the guardian or conservator for the faithful performance of which the guardian or conservator and the sureties on the bond are responsible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2359.

(a) Upon petition of the guardian or conservator or ward or conservatee or other interested person, the court may authorize and instruct the guardian or conservator or approve and confirm the acts of the guardian or conservator.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) (1) When a guardian or conservator petitions for the approval of a purchase, lease, or rental of real or personal property from the estate of a ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator shall provide a statement disclosing the family or affiliate relationship between the guardian and conservator and the purchaser, lessee, or renter of the property, and the family or affiliate relationship between the guardian or conservator and any agent hired by the guardian or conservator.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “family” means a person’s spouse, domestic partner, or relatives within the second degree of lineal or collateral consanguinity of a person or a person’s spouse. For the purposes of this subdivision, “affiliate” means an entity that is under the direct control, indirect control, or common control of the guardian or conservator.

(3) A violation of this section shall result in the rescission of the purchase, lease, or rental of the property. Any losses incurred by the estate of the ward or conservatee because the property was sold or leased at less than fair market value shall be deemed as charges against the guardian or conservator under the provisions of Sections 2401.3 and 2401.5. The court shall assess a civil penalty equal to three times the charges against the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section, and may assess punitive damages as it deems proper. If the estate does not incur losses as a result of the violation, the court shall order the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section to pay a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The fines and penalties provided in this section are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2360.

Upon the establishment of a conservatorship by the court and annually thereafter, the conservator shall ensure that a clear photograph of the conservatee is taken and preserved for the purpose of identifying the conservatee if he or she becomes missing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (AB 2493)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2361.

(a) A conservator shall provide notice of a conservatee’s death by delivering pursuant to Section 1215 a copy of the notice to all persons entitled to notice under Section 1460, including, but not limited to, a person who has requested special notice of the matter, as provided in Section 2700, and by filing a proof of delivery with the court, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(b) A conservator also shall provide notice, as specified in subdivision (a), of the date, time, and location of any funeral, burial, or memorial arrangements for the conservatee, if the conservator makes those arrangements. Notice pursuant to this subdivision shall be delivered electronically whenever
 possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.   (SB 1106)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Duties of Guardian or Conservator of the Estate [2400. - 2595.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [2400. - 2410.]

2400.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Conservator” means the conservator of the estate, or the limited conservator of the estate to the extent that the powers and duties of the limited conservator are specifically and expressly provided by the order appointing the limited conservator.

(b) “Estate” means all of the conservatee’s or ward’s personal property, wherever located, and real property located in this state.

(c) “Guardian” means the guardian of the estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

(a) The guardian or conservator, or limited conservator to the extent specifically and expressly provided in the appointing court’s order, has the management and control of the estate and, in managing and controlling the estate, shall use ordinary care and diligence. What constitutes use of ordinary care and diligence is determined by all the circumstances of the particular estate.

(b) The guardian or conservator:

(1) Shall exercise a power to the extent that ordinary care and diligence requires that the power be exercised.

(2) Shall not exercise a power to the extent that ordinary care and diligence requires that the power not be exercised.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a guardian or conservator who is not a trust company, or an employee of that guardian or conservator, in exercising their powers, may not hire or refer any business to an entity in which the guardian or conservator or an employee has a financial interest. For the purposes of this subdivision, “financial interest” shall mean (1) an ownership interest in a sole proprietorship, a partnership, or a closely held corporation, or (2) an ownership interest of greater than 1 percent of the outstanding shares in a publicly held corporation, or (3) being an officer or a director of a corporation.

(d) Subdivision (c) does not
 prohibit a professional fiduciary appointed as a guardian or conservator from hiring and compensating individuals as employees, with court approval.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a guardian or conservator who is a trust company, in exercising its powers may not, except upon authorization of the court, invest in securities of the trust company or an affiliate or subsidiary, or other securities from
 which the trust company or affiliate or subsidiary receives a financial benefit or in a mutual fund, other than a mutual fund authorized in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (Subchapter 1 (commencing with Sec. 80a-1) of Chapter 2D of Title 15 of the United States Code), to which the trust company or its affiliate provides services, including, but not limited to, services as an investment adviser, sponsor, distributor, custodian, agent, registrar, administrator, servicer, or manager, and for which the trust company or its affiliate receives compensation.

(2) Before authorization from the court, the guardian or conservator shall disclose to the court in writing the trust company’s financial interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 21.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.1.

The guardian or conservator shall use ordinary care and diligence to determine whether the ward or conservatee owns real property in a foreign jurisdiction and to preserve and protect that property. What constitutes use of ordinary care and diligence shall be determined by all the facts and circumstances known, or that become known, to the guardian or conservator, the value of the real property located in the foreign jurisdiction, and the needs of the ward or conservatee. The guardian or conservator, except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1061 and in Section 1062, is not charged with, and shall have no duty to inventory or account for the real property located in a foreign jurisdiction, but the guardian or conservator shall, when presenting the inventory and appraisal and accounting to the court, include the schedule set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 1063.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 52, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.3.

(a) If the guardian or conservator breaches a fiduciary duty, the guardian or conservator is chargeable with any of the following that is appropriate under the circumstances:

(1) Any loss or depreciation in value of the estate resulting from the breach of duty, with interest.

(2) Any profit made by the guardian or conservator through the breach of duty, with interest.

(3) Any profit that would have accrued to the estate if the loss of profit is the result of the breach of duty.

(b) If the guardian or conservator has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the guardian or conservator, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the guardian or conservator in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.5.

(a) If the guardian or conservator is liable for interest pursuant to Section 2401.3, the guardian or conservator is liable for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of interest that accrues at the legal rate on judgments.

(2) The amount of interest actually received.

(b) If the guardian or conservator has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the guardian or conservator, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the guardian or conservator in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 77, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.6.

Any surcharge that a guardian or conservator incurs under the provisions of Sections 2401.3 or 2401.5 may not be paid by or offset against future fees or wages to be provided by the estate to the guardian or conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 565, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.7.

The provisions of Sections 2401.3 and 2401.5 for liability of a guardian or conservator for breach of a fiduciary duty do not prevent resort to any other remedy available against the guardian or conservator under the statutory or common law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

When a guardian or conservator is appointed, the court may, with the consent of the guardian or conservator, insert in the order of appointment conditions not otherwise obligatory providing for the care and custody of the property of the ward or conservatee. Any such conditions shall be included in the letters. The performance of such conditions is a part of the duties of the guardian or conservator for the faithful performance of which the guardian or conservator and the sureties on the bond are responsible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

(a) Upon petition of the guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, a creditor, or other interested person, the court may authorize and instruct the guardian or conservator, or approve and confirm the acts of the guardian or conservator, in the administration, management, investment, disposition, care, protection, operation, or preservation of the estate, or the incurring or payment of costs, fees, or expenses in connection therewith.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) (1) When a guardian or conservator petitions for the approval of a purchase, lease, or rental of real or personal property from the estate of a ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator shall provide a statement disclosing the family or affiliate relationship between the guardian and conservator and the purchaser, lessee, or renter of the property, and the family or affiliate relationship between the guardian or conservator and any agent hired by the guardian or conservator.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “family” means a person’s spouse, domestic partner, or relatives within the second degree of lineal or collateral consanguinity of a person or a person’s spouse. For the purposes of this subdivision, “affiliate” means an entity that is under the direct control, indirect control, or common control of the guardian or conservator.

(3) A violation of this section shall result in the rescission of the purchase, lease, or rental of the property. Any losses incurred by the estate of the ward or conservatee because the property was sold or leased at less than fair market value shall be deemed as charges against the guardian or conservator under the provisions of Sections 2401.3 and 2401.5. The court shall assess a civil penalty equal to three times the charges against the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section, and may assess punitive damages as it deems proper. If the estate does not incur losses as a result of the violation, the court shall order the guardian, conservator, or other person in violation of this section to pay a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The fines and penalties provided in this section are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2404.

(a) If the guardian or conservator fails, neglects, or refuses to furnish comfortable and suitable support, maintenance, or education for the ward or conservatee as required by this division, or to pay a debt, expense, or charge lawfully due and payable by the ward or conservatee or the estate as provided in this division, the court shall, upon petition or upon its own motion, order the guardian or conservator to do so from the estate.

(b) The petition may be filed by the ward or conservatee or by the creditor or any other interested person. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2405.

If there is a dispute relating to the estate between the guardian or conservator and a third person, the guardian or conservator, or the limited conservator to the extent specifically and expressly provided in the order appointing the limited conservator, may do either of the following:

(a) Enter into an agreement in writing with the third person to refer the dispute to a temporary judge designated in the agreement. The agreement shall be filed with the clerk, who shall thereupon, with the approval of the court, enter an order referring the matter to the designated person. The temporary judge shall proceed promptly to hear and determine the matter in controversy by summary procedure, without any pleadings, discovery, or jury trial. The decision of the temporary judge is subject to Section 632 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Judgment shall be entered on the decision and is as valid and effective as if rendered by a judge of the court in an action against the guardian or conservator or the third person commenced by ordinary process.

(b) Enter into an agreement in writing with the third person that a judge of the court, pursuant to the agreement and with the written consent of the judge, both filed with the clerk within the time for bringing an independent action on the matter in dispute, may hear and determine the dispute pursuant to the procedure provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2406.

If there is a dispute relating to the estate between the guardian or conservator and a third person, the guardian or conservator may enter into an agreement in writing with the third person to submit the dispute to arbitration under Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The agreement is not effective unless it has first been approved by the court and a copy of the approved agreement is filed with the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2407.

This chapter applies to property owned by spouses as community property only to the extent authorized by Part 6 (commencing with Section 3000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 82.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2408.

Nothing in this chapter limits or restricts any authority granted to a guardian or conservator pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 2590) to administer the estate under that article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2410.

On or before January 1, 2008, the Judicial Council, in consultation with the California Judges Association, the California Association of Superior Court Investigators, the California State Association of Public Administrators, Public Guardians, and Public Conservators, the State Bar of California, the National Guardianship Association, and the Association of Professional Geriatric Care Managers, shall adopt a rule of court that shall require uniform standards of conduct for actions that conservators and guardians may take under this chapter on behalf of conservatees and wards to ensure that the estate of conservatees or wards are maintained and conserved as appropriate and to prevent risk of loss or harm to the conservatees or wards. This rule shall include at a minimum standards for determining the fees that may be charged to conservatees or wards and standards for asset management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Support and Maintenance of Ward or Conservatee and Dependents [2420. - 2423.]

2420.

(a) Subject to Section 2422, the guardian or conservator shall apply the income from the estate, so far as necessary, to the comfortable and suitable support, maintenance, and education of the ward or conservatee (including care, treatment, and support of a ward or conservatee who is a patient in a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services) and of those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the ward or conservatee, taking into account the value of the estate and the condition of life of the persons required to be furnished such support, maintenance, or education.

(b) If the
 income from the estate is insufficient for the purpose described in subdivision (a), the guardian or conservator may sell or give a security interest in or other lien on any personal property of the estate, or sell or mortgage or give a deed of trust on any real property of the estate, as provided in this part.

(c) When the amount paid by the guardian or conservator for the purpose described in subdivision (a) satisfies the standard set out in that subdivision, and the payments are supported by proper vouchers or other proof satisfactory to the court, the guardian or conservator shall be allowed credit for such payments when the accounts of the guardian or conservator are settled.

(d) Nothing in this section requires the guardian or conservator to obtain court authorization before making the payments authorized by this section, but nothing in this section dispenses with the need
 to obtain any court authorization otherwise required for a particular transaction.

(e) Nothing in this section precludes the guardian or conservator from seeking court authorization or instructions or approval and confirmation pursuant to Section 2403.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 44.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2421.

(a) Upon petition of the guardian or conservator or the ward or conservatee, the court may authorize the guardian or conservator to pay to the ward or conservatee out of the estate a reasonable allowance for the personal use of the ward or conservatee. The allowance shall be in such amount as the court may determine to be for the best interests of the ward or conservatee.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) The guardian or conservator is not required to account for such allowance other than to establish that it has been paid to the ward or conservatee. The funds so paid are subject to the sole control of the ward or conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2422.

(a) Upon petition of the guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, or any other interested person, the court may for good cause order the ward or conservatee to be wholly or partially supported, maintained, or educated out of the estate notwithstanding the existence of a third party legally obligated to provide such support, maintenance, or education. Such order may be made for a limited period of time. If not so limited, it continues in effect until modified or revoked.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2423.

(a) Upon petition of the conservator, the conservatee, the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee, or a relative within the second degree of the conservatee, the court may by order authorize or direct the conservator to pay and distribute surplus income of the estate or any part of the surplus income (not used for the support, maintenance, and education of the conservatee and of those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the conservatee) to the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee and to relatives within the second degree of the conservatee whom the conservatee would, in the judgment of the court, have aided but for the existence of the conservatorship. The court in ordering payments under this section may impose conditions if the court determines that the conservatee would have imposed the conditions if the conservatee had the capacity to act.

(b) The granting of the order and the amounts and proportions of the payments are discretionary with the court, but the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The amount of surplus income available after adequate provision has been made for the comfortable and suitable support, maintenance, and education of the conservatee and of those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the conservatee.

(2) The circumstances and condition of life to which the conservatee and the spouse or domestic partner and relatives have been accustomed.

(3) The amount that the conservatee would in the judgment of the court have allowed the spouse or domestic partner and relatives but for the existence of the conservatorship.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Payment of Debts and Expenses [2430. - 2431.]

2430.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the guardian or conservator shall pay the following from any principal and income of the estate:

(1) The debts incurred by the ward or conservatee before creation of the guardianship or conservatorship, giving priority to the debts described in Section 2431 to the extent required by that section.

(2) The debts incurred by the ward or conservatee during the guardianship or conservatorship to provide the necessaries of life to the ward or conservatee, and to the spouse and minor children of the ward or conservatee, to the extent the debt is reasonable. Also, the debts reasonably incurred by the conservatee during the conservatorship to provide the basic living expenses, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, to the domestic partner of the conservatee. The guardian or conservator may deduct the amount of any payments for these debts from any allowance otherwise payable to the ward or conservatee.

(3) In the case of a conservatorship, any other debt incurred by the conservatee during the conservatorship only if the debt satisfies the requirements of any order made under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1870) of Part 3.

(4) The reasonable expenses incurred in the collection, care, and administration of the estate, but court authorization is required for payment of compensation to any of the following:

(A) The guardian or conservator of the person or estate or both.

(B) An attorney for the guardian or conservator of the person or estate or both.

(C) An attorney for the ward or conservatee.

(D) An attorney for the estate.

(E) The public guardian for the costs and fee under Section 2902.

(b) The payments provided for by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) are not required to be made to the extent the payments would impair the ability to provide the necessaries of life to the conservatee and the spouse and minor children of the conservatee and to provide the basic living expenses, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, of the domestic partner of the conservatee.

(c) The guardian or conservator may petition the court under Section 2403 for instructions when there is doubt whether a debt should be paid under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2431.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), the guardian or conservator may petition the court under Section 2403 for instructions when there is doubt whether a wage claim should be paid under this section.

(b) The guardian or conservator shall promptly pay wage claims for work done or services rendered for the ward or conservatee within 30 days prior to the date the petition for appointment of the guardian or conservator was filed. The payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed nine hundred dollars ($900) to each claimant. If there is insufficient money to pay all the claims described in this subdivision up to nine hundred dollars ($900), the money available shall be distributed among such claimants in proportion to the amount of their respective claims.

(c) After the payments referred to in subdivision (b) have been made, the guardian or conservator shall pay wage claims for work done or services rendered for the ward or conservatee within 90 days prior to the date the petition for appointment of the guardian or conservator was filed, excluding the claims described in subdivision (b). The payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) to each claimant. If there is insufficient money to pay all the claims described in this subdivision up to one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100), the money available shall be distributed among such claimants in proportion to the amounts of their respective claims.

(d) The guardian or conservator may require sworn claims to be presented. If there is reasonable cause to believe that the claim is not valid, the guardian or conservator may refuse to pay the claim in whole or in part but shall pay any part thereof that is not disputed without prejudice to the claimant’s rights as to the balance of the claim. The guardian or conservator shall withhold sufficient money to cover the disputed portion until the claimant has had a reasonable opportunity to establish the validity of the claim by bringing an action, either in the claimant’s own name or through an assignee, against the guardian or conservator.

(e) If the guardian or conservator neglects or refuses to pay all or any portion of a claim which is not in dispute, the court shall order the guardian or conservator to do so upon the informal application of any wage claimant or the assignee or legal representative of such claimant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Estate Management Powers Generally [2450. - 2469.]

2450.

(a) Unless this article specifically provides a proceeding to obtain court authorization or requires court authorization, the powers and duties set forth in this article may be exercised or performed by the guardian or conservator without court authorization, instruction, approval, or confirmation. Nothing in this subdivision precludes the guardian or conservator from seeking court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation pursuant to Section 2403.

(b) Upon petition of the ward or conservatee, a creditor, or any other interested person, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may limit the authority of the guardian or conservator under subdivision (a) as to a particular power or duty or as to particular powers or duties. Notice of the hearing on a petition under this subdivision shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2451.

The guardian or conservator may collect debts and benefits due to the ward or conservatee and the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2451.5.

The guardian or conservator may do any of the following:

(a) Contract for the guardianship or conservatorship, perform outstanding contracts, and, thereby, bind the estate.

(b) Purchase tangible personal property.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2640), employ an attorney to advise and represent the guardian or conservator in all matters, including the conservatorship proceeding and all other actions or proceedings.

(d) Employ and pay the expense of accountants, investment advisers, agents, depositaries, and employees.

(e) Operate for a period of 45 days after the issuance of the letters of guardianship or conservatorship, at the risk of the estate, a business, farm, or enterprise constituting an asset of the estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2452.

(a) The guardian or conservator may endorse and cash or deposit any checks, warrants, or drafts payable to the ward or conservatee which constitute property of the estate.

(b) If it appears likely that the estate will satisfy the conditions of subdivision (b) of Section 2628, the court may order that the guardian or conservator be the designated payee for public assistance payments received pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11000) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.

The guardian or conservator may deposit money belonging to the estate in an insured account in a financial institution in this state. Unless otherwise provided by court order, the money deposited under this section may be withdrawn without order of court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), where a trust company is a guardian or conservator and in the exercise of reasonable judgment deposits money of the estate in an account in any department of the corporation or association of which it is a part, it is chargeable with interest thereon at the rate of interest prevailing among banks of the locality on such deposits.

(b) Where it is to the advantage of the estate, the amount of cash that is reasonably necessary for orderly administration of the estate may be deposited in a checking account that does not bear interest which is maintained in a department of the corporation or association of which the trust company is a party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.
